Florida, session 2026, SB590.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSubsection (23) is added to section 775.15, 14 Florida Statutes, to read: 15 775.15âTime limitations; general time limitations; 16 exceptions.â 17 (23)âIf the offense is a violation of s. 39.201, the 18 applicable period of limitation does not begin to run until a 19 law enforcement agency or other governmental agency, excluding 20 any institution where the violation occurs, is made aware of the 21 violation. This subsection applies to any offense that is not 22 otherwise barred from prosecution on or before July 1, 2026. 23 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.